Washington statutes.
RCW 4.40.070

Trial of other issues of fact.

Every other issue of fact shall be tried by the court, subject, however, to the right of the parties to consent, or of the court to order, that the whole issue, or any specific question of fact involved therein, be tried by a jury, or referred.

[ 1893 c 127 s 34; RRS s 315.]